District of Columbia statutes.
6-101.04

National Capital Housing Authority — Annual report — Proposals for operations of succeeding fiscal year.

The objects set forth in § 6-101.01 shall be accomplished as rapidly as feasible and to this end the Authority shall, in each annual report, set forth what it proposes to do during the next succeeding fiscal year.

June 12, 1934, 48 Stat. 932, ch. 465, § 4
June 8, 1944, 58 Stat. 271, ch. 238, § 1
July 5, 1945, 59 Stat. 410, ch. 268, § 1
June 26, 1946, 60 Stat. 319, ch. 503, § 1
Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 801, ch. 736, § 18(a)
Aug. 16, 1954, 68 Stat. 731, ch. 739, § 2
1981 Ed., § 5-105.
1973 Ed., § 5-106.